nl: Thema notitiekaart: Alfabet; Talen; Wiskunde; Nummers; Wetenschap; Zichtwoorden; Trivia; Andere
sk-SK: Motív flash kariet: Abeceda; Jazyky; Matematika; Čísla; Veda; Slová zapamätané zrakom; Zaujímavosti; Iné
pt-BR: Tema de cartão de memória: Alfabeto; Línguas; Matemática; Números; Ciência; Palavras à vista; Curiosidades; Outro
fr: Thème de la carte flash: Alphabet; Langues; Mathématiques; Nombres; Sciences; Mots clés; Culture générale; Autre
nb: Flash-korttema: Alfabet; Språk; Matematikk; Tall; Vitenskap; Synsord; Trivia; Annet
zh-CN: 闪卡主题: 字母表; 语言; 数学; 数字主题; 科学; 常见字/高频词; 益智问答; 其他
sl-SI: Tema kartice za učenje: Abeceda; Jeziki; Matematika; Številke; Znanost; Pogoste besede; Trivia; Drugo
fi: Muistikortin teema: Aakkoset; Kielet; Matematiikka; Numerot; Tiede; Sanojen tunnistaminen; Trivia; Muu
en: Flash card theme: Alphabet; Languages; Mathematics; Numbers; Science; Sight words; Trivia; Other
ro-RO: Tema card memorare: Alfabet; Limbi; Matematică; Numere; Știință; Cuvinte; Trivia; Altele
vi: Chủ đề thẻ flash: Bảng chữ cái; Ngôn ngữ; Toán học; Chữ số; Khoa học; Các từ phổ biến; Câu đố; Khác
de: Flash-Kartenthema: Alphabet; Sprachen; Mathematik; Zahlen; Wissenschaft; Sichtwörter; Quiz; Sonstiges
th: ธีมแฟลชการ์ด: ตัวอักษร; ภาษาศาสตร์; คณิตศาสตร์; ตัวเลข; วิทศาสตร์; คำที่พบเห็นบ่อย; เกร็ดความรู้; อื่นๆ
ru: Тематика развивающих карточек: Алфавит; Языки; Математика; Числа; Наука; Слова для просмотра; Интересные факты; Другой
hr-HR: Tema didaktičkih kartica: Abeceda; Jezici; Matematika; Brojevi; Znanost; Česte riječi; Zanimljivosti; Ostalo
hu: Szókártya témája: Ábécé; Nyelvek; Matematika; Számok; Tudomány; Képolvasás; Apróságok; Egyéb
sv: Tema på frågekort: Alfabet; Språk; Matematik; Siffror; Vetenskap; Synord; Trivia; Övrigt
el: Θέμα καρτών εκμάθησης: Αλφάβητο; Γλώσσες; Μαθηματικά; Αριθμοί; Επιστήμη; Λέξεις όρασης; Γενικές γνώσεις; Άλλο
da: Tema for flash-kort: Alfabet; Sprog; Matematik; Numre; Videnskab; Synsord; Trivia; Andet
it: Tema della scheda flash: Alfabeto; Lingue; Matematica; Numeri; Scienza; Parole visive; Cultura generale; Altro
tr: Flash kart teması: Alfabe; Diller; Matematik; Sayılar; Bilim; Görme Kelimeleri; Önemsiz bilgiler; Diğer
cs: Motiv flash karty: Abeceda; Jazyky; Matematika; Čísla; Věda; Zobrazení slov; Základní znalosti; Jiné
ko: 플래시 카드 테마: 알파벳; 언어; 수학; 숫자; 과학; Sight words; 트리비아; 기타
lt-LT: Atverčiamų kortelių tema: Abėcėlė; Kalbos; Matematika; Skaičiai; Mokslas; Įsimintini žodžiai; Klausimai ir atsakymai; Kita
bg-BG: Тема за флашкарта: Азбука; Езици; Математика; Числа; Наука; Познавателни думи; Любопитни факти; Други
pl: Motyw fiszki: Alfabet; Języki; Matematyka; Liczby; Nauki ścisłe; Gra w zapamiętywanie słów; Ciekawostki; Inne
zh-TW: 抽認卡主題: 字母表; 語言; 數學; 數位; 科學; 認字遊戲; 小知識; 其他
ja: フラッシュカードのテーマ: アルファベット; 国語; 数学; 数字; 科学; サイトワード; トリビア; その他
es: Tema de la tarjeta flash: Alfabeto; Idiomas; Matemáticas; Números; Ciencia; Palabras visuales; Trivialidades; Otros
pt-PT: Tema de cartão flash: Alfabeto; Línguas; Matemática; Números; Ciência; Palavras à vista; Curiosidades; Outro